Illinois, session 104th, HB2955.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the PFAS 5Wastewater Citizen Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Findings; policy. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Current scientific research suggests that exposure 9    to certain perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances 10    (PFAS) may cause adverse human health impacts.11        (2) Once released, PFAS do not naturally degrade and 12    may be difficult and costly to remove from the 13    environment.14        (3) PFAS enter wastewater treatment plants through 15    wastewater discharges associated with consumer products, 16    industrial products, and solid waste streams, such as 17    landfill leachate.18        (4) Wastewater agencies do not manufacture, 19    intentionally use, or sell PFAS.20        (5) Landfills do not manufacture, intentionally use, 21    or sell PFAS.22        (6) Wastewater treatment plants, which are generally 23    owned by wastewater agencies and funded by taxpayers and   HB2955 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03057 BDA 13075 b1    customers within a specific service area, are not designed 2    for or easily adapted to treat wastewater for PFAS.3        (7) Wastewater agencies are incurring monitoring, 4    staff, and other costs. If wastewater agencies are 5    required to treat wastewater for PFAS in the future, that 6    treatment will come at a significant operational and 7    capital cost that taxpayers and customers must recoup.8    (b) It is the policy of the State of Illinois that, as it 9relates to PFAS, PFAS elimination, and PFAS mitigation in 10wastewater:11        (1) The State should follow sound science, use 12    existing source control regulatory frameworks, avoid 13    unintended negative consequences to the citizens of the 14    State, and facilitate funding to eliminate or mitigate 15    PFAS in wastewater.16        (2) The economic impact upon wastewater agencies and 17    Illinois citizens for the costs to implement any federal 18    or State policy, rule, or regulation relating to PFAS 19    monitoring, elimination, and mitigation, including 20    requirements in permits issued to any wastewater agency, 21    should be minimized to the extent practicable.22        (3) All stakeholders, including wastewater agencies 23    and their customers, industry, and regulators benefit from 24    increased understanding and advancements in PFAS 25    remediation and destruction technology.26        (4) Compliance with this Act should not relieve any   HB2955 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03057 BDA 13075 b1    person of responsibility for compliance with the 2    Environmental Protection Act or any other applicable 3    federal, State, or local law. 4    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:5    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency.6    "Committee" means the PFAS Wastewater Citizen Protection 7Committee created under this Act.8    "Director" means the Director of the Environmental 9Protection Agency.10    "PFAS" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl 11substances. "PFAS" includes PFAS as defined by the United 12States Environmental Protection Agency in 40 CFR 705.3 or any 13successor regulations.14    "State" means the State of Illinois.15    "Wastewater agencies" means municipal wastewater agencies; 16units of local government organized under the Sanitary 17District Act of 1907, North Shore Water Reclamation District 18Act, Sanitary District Act of 1917, Metropolitan Water 19Reclamation District Act, Sanitary District Act of 1936, 20Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974, or Eastern Will 21Sanitary District Act; and public utilities that provide water 22and wastewater service in Illinois. 23    Section 15. PFAS Wastewater Citizen Protection Committee. 24    (a) The PFAS Wastewater Citizen Protection Committee is   HB2955 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 03057 BDA 13075 b1created within the Agency for the purposes of:2        (1) monitoring developments and reviewing data related 3    to PFAS, PFAS regulation, and PFAS elimination and 4    mitigation technology for wastewater treatment systems;5        (2) determining how to best implement the findings and 6    policy in Section 5 of this Act, including in relation to 7    federal statutes and regulations;8        (3) determining the range of options to mitigate the 9    presence of PFAS, including, if necessary, costs to 10    install treatment technology to reduce PFAS in wastewater 11    treatment systems and costs for PFAS sampling, analysis, 12    research, monitoring, and record keeping;13        (4) determining how to offset the costs to wastewater 14    agencies needed to install PFAS elimination and mitigation 15    technology in wastewater treatment systems by identifying 16    all potential sources of funding, including indirect 17    discharge fees, State and federal funding, and 18    manufacturers and commercial and industrial users of PFAS;19        (5) making recommendations regarding policies, 20    including legislation and rulemaking, necessary to 21    implement the findings and policy in Section 5 of this 22    Act; and23        (6) making recommendations regarding the funding of 24    elimination and mitigation technology for wastewater 25    treatment systems and recovering taxpayer and customer 26    costs for PFAS.  HB2955 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 03057 BDA 13075 b1    (b) No later than one year after the effective date of this 2Act, the Committee shall issue a report containing a PFAS 3Action Plan based on the purposes stated in subsection (a) of 4this Section. The report shall be submitted to the Governor's 5Office, the General Assembly, and the Agency.6    (c) The Committee shall monitor the status of and, if 7necessary, advocate for the execution of the PFAS Action Plan 8submitted with its report under subsection (b) of this 9Section.10    (d) The Committee shall continue to periodically meet 11after submittal of the PFAS Action Plan under subsection (b) 12of this Section. The Committee shall annually update the PFAS 13Action Plan, and shall submit a report annually to the 14Governor's Office, the General Assembly, and the Agency with 15any updates to the PFAS Action Plan and a summary of: 16        (1) the latest developments in related science and 17    technology, as well as the latest developments in 18    approaches to PFAS elimination and mitigation in 19    wastewater; 20        (2) any updated policy recommendations the Committee 21    feels necessary to implement the findings and policy in 22    Section 5 of this Act; 23        (3) any cost updates for addressing any policy 24    recommendations the Committee feels necessary to implement 25    the findings and policy in Section 5 of this Act; and 26        (4) any updated developments or recommendations   HB2955 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 03057 BDA 13075 b1    regarding the identification of potential sources of 2    funding to offset the costs to wastewater agencies. 3    Section 20. Committee membership. The Committee shall be 4composed of the following members:5        (1) the Governor or the Governor's designee, who shall 6    serve as chairperson;7        (2) the Director or the Director's designee;8        (3) one member appointed by the President of the 9    Senate;10        (4) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 11    Senate;12        (5) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House 13    of Representatives;14        (6) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 15    House of Representatives; and16        (7) the following members appointed by the Director:17            (A) 2 members who are representatives of a 18        wastewater agency with a service population of 25,000 19        or less;20            (B) 2 members who are representatives of a 21        wastewater agency with a service population of more 22        than 25,000 but less than or equal to 125,000;23            (C) 2 members who are representatives of a 24        wastewater agency with a service population of more 25        than 125,000;  HB2955 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 03057 BDA 13075 b1            (D) one member who is a representative of a 2        statewide organization representing wastewater 3        agencies;4            (E) one member who is a representative of a 5        statewide organization representing publicly owned 6        drinking water agencies;7            (F) one member who is a researcher from a 8        university in the Great Lakes region who specializes 9        in PFAS;10            (G) one member who is a representative of a public 11        utility that provides water and wastewater services in 12        Illinois;13            (H) one member who is a representative of a 14        statewide organization representing the solid waste 15        and recycling industry; and16            (I) one member who is a representative of a 17        statewide organization representing the manufacturing 18        industry.19    Appointments to the Committee shall be made within 30 days 20after the effective date of this Act. The Committee shall meet 21at the call of the chairperson. Committee members shall serve 22without compensation. If a vacancy occurs in the Committee 23membership, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as 24the original appointment for the remainder of the Committee. 25    Section 25. Committee technical assistance. The Prairie   HB2955 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 03057 BDA 13075 b1Research Institute's Illinois Sustainable Technology Center 2shall provide technical assistance to the Committee. 3    Section 85. Applicable federal, State, and local laws. 4Compliance with this Act does not relieve any person of 5responsibility for compliance with the Environmental 6Protection Act or any other applicable federal, State, or 7local law. 8    Section 90. Repeal. This Act is repealed on December 31, 92044. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.